Hawaii statutes.
§263A-4 Consent of person incapable of
refusal not withdrawn. The consent of a person deemed to have given
consent pursuant to section 263A-1 shall not be withdrawn by reason of the
person's being dead, unconscious, or in any other state which renders the
person incapable of consenting to examination, and the test may be given. In
such event, a test of the person's blood shall be administered. [L 1991, c 274,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next